Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-706.09
Cleaning and disinfection of affected premises.

(1) All premises that are determined by the State Veterinarian to constitute a health hazard to animals because of bovine tuberculosis shall be properly cleaned and disinfected in accordance with the Bovine Tuberculosis Act.

(2) The State Veterinarian may require and supervise the prescribed cleaning and disinfection of affected premises.

Laws 2007, LB110, § 9.